New York, session 2025-2026, S7008.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The uniform justice court act is amended by adding a new 2 section 105-a to read as follows: 3 § 105-a. Minimum educational requirements of certain town and village 4 justices. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any town 6 or village, may by a majority vote of the governing body of such town or 7 village, require that any person who serves as a town or village justice 8 be admitted to practice law in the state. Any change in the require- 9 ments for eligibility to serve as town or village justice shall take 10 effect upon commencement of the next judicial term of office following 11 the election after enactment of the local law. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 13 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06188-01-5